Illinois, session 104th, SB2799.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Genetic Information Privacy Act is amended 5by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 513/20)7    Sec. 20. Use of genetic testing information for insurance 8purposes. 9    (a) An insurer may not seek information derived from 10genetic testing for use in connection with a policy of 11accident and health insurance. Except as provided in 12subsection (c), an insurer that receives information derived 13from genetic testing, regardless of the source of that 14information, may not use the information for a nontherapeutic 15purpose as it relates to a policy of accident and health 16insurance.17    (b) An insurer shall not use or disclose protected health 18information that is genetic information for underwriting 19purposes. For purposes of this Section, "underwriting 20purposes" means, with respect to an insurer: 21        (1) rules for, or determination of, eligibility 22    (including enrollment and continued eligibility) for, or 23    determination of, benefits under the plan, coverage, or   SB2799- 2 -LRB104 17263 BAB 30685 b1    policy (including changes in deductibles or other 2    cost-sharing mechanisms in return for activities such as 3    completing a health risk assessment or participating in a 4    wellness program);5        (2) the computation of premium or contribution amounts 6    under the plan, coverage, or policy (including discounts, 7    rebates, payments in kind, or other premium differential 8    mechanisms in return for activities, such as completing a 9    health risk assessment or participating in a wellness 10    program);11        (3) the application of any pre-existing condition 12    exclusion under the plan, coverage, or policy; and13        (4) other activities related to the creation, renewal, 14    or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health 15    benefits. 16    "Underwriting purposes" does not include determinations of 17medical appropriateness where an individual seeks a benefit 18under the plan, coverage, or policy.19    This subsection (b) does not apply to insurers that are 20issuing a long-term care policy, excluding a nursing home 21fixed indemnity plan. 22    (c) An insurer may consider the results of genetic testing 23in connection with a policy of accident and health insurance 24if the individual voluntarily submits the results and the 25results are favorable to the individual.26    (d) An insurer that possesses information derived from   SB2799- 3 -LRB104 17263 BAB 30685 b1genetic testing may not release the information to a third 2party, except as specified in this Act.3    (e) A company providing direct-to-consumer commercial 4genetic testing is prohibited from sharing any genetic test 5information or other personally identifiable information about 6a consumer with any health or life insurance company without 7written consent from the consumer. 8    (f) A health insurer, life insurer, disability insurer, or 9long-term care insurer authorized to transact insurance in 10this State may not:11        (1) cancel, limit, or deny coverage or establish 12    differentials in premium rates based on genetic 13    information collected, used, or stored for health care 14    treatment; or15        (2) require or solicit an individual's genetic 16    information, use an individual's genetic test results, or 17    consider an individual's decisions or actions relating to 18    genetic information or a genetic test in any manner for 19    any insurance purpose.20    This subsection applies to any policy, contract, or plan 21that is offered, entered into, issued, amended, or renewed on 22or after January 1, 2027 by a health insurer, life insurer, 23disability insurer, or long-term care insurer authorized to 24transact insurance in this State. 25    (g) Nothing in this Section may be construed as:26        (1) preventing a life insurer, disability insurer, or   SB2799- 4 -LRB104 17263 BAB 30685 b1    long-term care insurer from accessing an individual's 2    medical record as part of an application; or3        (2) prohibiting a life insurer, disability insurer, or 4    long-term care insurer from considering a clinical 5    diagnosis, such as a manifest disease or disorder, 6    included in an individual's medical record for insurance 7    purposes to the extent otherwise allowable by law.8(Source: P.A. 101-132, eff. 1-1-20.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.